Washington statutes.
RCW 7.43.030

Temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction.

Upon application for a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, the court may, upon a showing of good cause, issue an ex parte restraining order or preliminary injunction, preventing the defendant and all other persons from removing or in any manner interfering with the personal property and contents of the place where the nuisance is alleged to exist and may grant such preliminary equitable relief as is necessary to prevent the continuance or recurrence of the nuisance pending final resolution of the matter on the merits. However, pending the decision, the stock in trade may not be so restrained, but an inventory and full accounting of all business transactions may be required.

The restraining order or preliminary injunction may be served by handing to and leaving a copy with any person in charge of the place or residing in the place, or by posting a copy in a conspicuous place at or upon one or more of the principal doors or entrances to the place, or by both delivery and posting. The officer serving the order or injunction shall forthwith make and return into court an inventory of the personal property and contents situated in and used in conducting or maintaining the nuisance.

Any violation of the order or injunction is a contempt of court, and where such order or injunction is posted, mutilation or removal thereof while the same remains in force is a contempt of court if such posted order or injunction contains a notice to that effect.

[ 1988 c 141 s 6.]